Arkansas statutes. Title 10 General Assembly
Chapter 2 Legislative Proceedings
Subchapter 2

— Compensation and Expenses

Cross References. Compensation for attending meetings and conferences, §§10-3-209 —10-3-212.

No expense authorized except by bill duly passed and signed by Governor, Ark. Const., Art. 5, § 41 [as added to Art. 5 by Ark. Const. Amend. 19].

Effective Dates. Acts 1921, No. 115, § 4: Feb. 12, 1921. Emergency declared.

Acts 1961, No. 112, § 2: Feb. 17, 1961. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the appropriation for the payment of salaries of the members of the General Assembly for the current biennial period will expire on June 30, 1961; that the payment of the unpaid portion of the salaries due widows or next of kin of deceased members of the Sixty-Second General Assembly under the provision of this act will have to be paid on or before June 30, 1961 if the same is to be paid from the current appropriation; and that the immediate passage of this act is necessary to make such payment. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act, immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1963, No. 259, §§ 3, 4: effective retroactive to Feb. 1, 1963. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the present law relative to the payment of the salary of deceased members of the General Assembly to the survivors of such members is limited to widows, children and next of kin, and that no provision is made for the payment of the same to surviving husbands of deceased members, and that this law is immediately necessary to correct this situation. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in effect from the date of its passage and approval.” Approved March 18, 1963.

Acts 1975, No. 169, § 5: July 1, 1975. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the maximum allowable expense reimbursement provided in Act 274 of 1971 for expenses incurred by members of the General Assembly in carrying out their official duties during the interim is inadequate to permit proper reimbursement of members of the General Assembly for their actual expenses incurred in the performance of their duties; that it is essential to the effective and efficient administration of the legislative affairs of the state that the maximum monthly reimbursement authorization be increased effective July 1, 1975; that unless an emergency is declared, an extension of the Regular Session of the General Assembly might result in this act not becoming effective on July 1, 1975. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1975.”

Acts 1985, No. 187, § 4: Feb. 26, 1985. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the laws of this state governing the per diem to be paid to members of the General Assembly for attendance at various interim committee meetings have been enacted at several legislative sessions, and there is a lack of uniformity in the per diem allowances for members of the General Assembly for attending meetings of a number of said interim committees, and that the immediate passage of this act is necessary in order to establish a uniform per diem allowance for members of the General Assembly who attend meetings of joint interim committees, or for performance of other legislative duties as authorized by law. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1987, No. 935, § 17: July 1, 1987. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Sixth General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two (2) year period; that the effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 1987 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 1987 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1987.”

Acts 1989 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 3, § 17: July 1, 1989. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Seventh General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two (2) year period; that the effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 1989 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 1989 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1989.”

Acts 1989 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 116, § 15: July 1, 1989. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Seventh General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two (2) year period; that the effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 1989 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 1989 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1989.”

Acts 1989 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 143, § 18: June 23, 1989. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby determined that matters vitally affecting the welfare of the State of Arkansas must be dealt with by the Seventy-Seventh General Assembly, and this Act being necessary for the preservation of the peace, health and safety of the people of the State of Arkansas, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this Act shall take effect and be in full force from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1989 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 204, § 16: June 23, 1989. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby determined that matters vitally affecting the welfare of the State of Arkansas must be dealt with by the Seventy-Seventh General Assembly, and this Act being necessary for the preservation of the peace, health and safety of the people of the State of Arkansas, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act shall take effect and be in full force from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1991, No. 7, § 19: July 1, 1991. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Eighth General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two (2) year period; that the effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 1991 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 1991 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1991.”

Acts 1991, No. 30, § 14: July 1, 1991. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Eighth General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two (2) year period; that the effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 1991 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 1991 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1991.”

Acts 1991, No. 969, § 11: Jan. 1, 1991. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that recent changes in federal law necessitate an immediate change in the method of reimbursing members of the General Assembly for legislative expenses; this Act grants the authority to the House and Senate to establish expense reimbursement procedures; and this should go into effect immediately in order to allow the House and Senate to comply with federal regulations as soon as possible. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after January 1, 1991.”

Acts 1991, No. 1240, § 11: Jan. 1, 1991. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that recent changes in federal law necessitate an immediate change in the method of reimbursing members of the General Assembly for legislative expenses; this Act grants the authority to the House and Senate to establish expense reimbursement procedures; and this should go into effect immediately in order to allow the House and Senate to comply with federal regulations as soon as possible. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after January 1, 1991.”

Acts 1995, No. 1312, § 36: July 1, 1995. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eightieth General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two (2) year period; that the effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 1995 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 1995 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, Sections 9 as added by House Amendment 1, 12 as added by House Amendment 4, and 15 through 19 as added by House Amendment 10 shall be in full force and effect from and after the date of passage and approval and the remainder of the act shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1995.”

Acts 1997, No. 1285, § 32: July 1, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-First General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two (2) year period; that the effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 1997 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 1997 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety Section 10 of this act shall be in full force and effect from and after the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, Section 10 shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, Section 10 shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto. The remaining sections of this act shall become effective from and after July 1, 1997.”

Acts 2003, No. 744, § 4: became law without the Governor's signature. Noted Mar. 27, 2003. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the Eighty-Fourth General Assembly will not be able to complete its business without entering into an extended recess to enable its various committees to meet, study, and report on some important issues facing the General Assembly; that under present law, many of the committees are authorized to meet and receive reimbursement for expenses incurred in attending committee meetings only during the interim between sessions of the General Assembly and not during a recess; that this act is designed to permit committees to meet and conduct business during an extended recess of the General Assembly and should be given effect immediately to enable committees to meet and give the General Assembly the benefit of their findings and recommendations before the General Assembly reconvenes after the extended recess. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2005, No. 2100, § 22: July 1, 2005. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two (2) year period; that the effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 2005 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 2005 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 2005.”

Acts 2007, No. 288, § 4: effective retroactively to March 1, 2007.

Acts 2007, No. 288, § 5: March 16, 2007. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the amount of legislative expense reimbursement, in lieu of per diem payments, and compensation for chairs and cochairs has not been updated in several years; that this act adjusts the payments for inflation factors; and that this act is immediately necessary in order to provide payments at the corrected amounts. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2009, No. 2, § 6: Jan. 15, 2009. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly, that the House of Representatives of the 87th General Assembly convenes in regular session on January 12, 2009; that expenses of the session begin immediately; and that the expenses are a just expense of state which must be paid at the time the services are provided. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after the date of its passage and approval. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2011, No. 1, § 6: Jan. 19, 2011. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the GeneralAssembly that the Arkansas Senate of the 88th General Assembly convenes in regular session on January 10, 2011; that expenses of the session begin immediately; and that the expenses are a just expense of the state which must be paid at the time the services are provided. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after the date of its passage and approval. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Identical Acts 2015, Nos. 555 and 556, § 5: Mar. 20, 2015. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the under Amendment 94 the Independent Citizens Commission submitted a recommendation regarding expense reimbursement to the Speaker of the House and the President Pro Tempore of the Senate; that the Speaker of the House and the President Pro Tempore of the Senate in coordination with the Independent Citizens Commission are implementing the recommendations submitted; and that this act is immediately necessary to ensure that provisions of Amendment 94 are carried out in accordance with its language. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

10-2-201. Payment of salaries.

The annual salaries of members of the Senate and the House of Representatives established by law shall be payable in equal monthly installments from funds appropriated for that purpose.

The Auditor of State is designated as disbursing officer of funds appropriated for payment of salaries of members of the General Assembly.

The provisions of this subsection shall not apply to any per diem, mileage, or other allowances payable to members of the General Assembly, and the per diem, mileage, or other allowances shall be payable in the manner prescribed by law.

The salaries which are due the members and officers of the General Assembly shall be certified by the President of the Senate and the Speaker of the House of Representatives, respectively, to the Auditor of State, who shall issue his or her warrant therefor on the Treasurer of State, which shall be paid out of any moneys in the State Treasury not otherwise appropriated.

The expiration of the deceased member's term; or

Until the deceased member's successor shall have been elected and qualified.

Publisher's Notes. This section, concerning interim services of General Assembly members and public policy, was repealed by identical Acts 1991, Nos. 969 and 1240, § 10. The section was derived from Acts 1971, No. 274, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 4-138.

The Speaker of the House of Representatives shall notify the House of Representatives disbursing officer regarding the actions of the Speaker of the House of Representatives under this subsection.

Subdivision (b)(1) of this section does not apply to per diem, mileage, and expense reimbursements paid from funds disbursed by the Legislative Auditor or the Director of the Bureau of Legislative Research.

A member of the General Assembly shall not file with the House of Representatives or Senate claims for per diem or mileage reimbursement in excess of the maximum amount prescribed by law.

A.C.R.C. Notes. As enacted, subdivision (d)(3) provided that an election not to receive per diem and mileage payments must occur prior to “adjournment of the 1991 regular session and prior to” the fifth day of the “succeeding” regular sessions.

Acts 2007, No. 288, § 4, provided: “This act shall apply retroactively to March 1, 2007.”

Amendments. The 2007 amendment substituted “fourteen thousand four hundred dollars ($14,400)” for “nine thousand six hundred dollars ($9,600)” in (c); and in (d), substituted “ten thousand two hundred dollars ($10,200)” for “six thousand eight hundred dollars ($6,800)” in (1), and added (3)(B) and made a related change.

The 2015 amendment by identical acts Nos. 555 and 556 substituted “Per diem and mileage reimbursement” for “Reimbursable expenses” in the section heading; deleted former (a)(1) and redesignated former (a)(2) as (a)(1); in present (a)(1), deleted “The Senate Efficacy Committee is hereby authorized to establish the method of reimbursing members of the Senate for ordinary and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their dutiesas members of the General Assembly” at the beginning and deleted “which expenditures constitute ordinary and necessary expenses and” following “guidelines”; substituted “Subdivision (a)(1)” for “Subsection (a)” at the beginning of present (a)(2); deleted former (b)(1) and redesignated former (b)(2)(A) as (b)(1)(A); in (b)(1)(A), deleted “The Speaker of the House of Representatives is hereby authorized to establish the method of reimbursing members of the House for ordinary and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their duties as members of the General Assembly” at the beginning and deleted “which expenditures constitute ordinary and necessary expenses and” following “guidelines”; substituted “Subdivision (b)(1)” for “Subsection (b)” in present (b)(2); deleted former (c) and (d) and redesignated (e) as (c); and, in present (c), inserted “of Representatives” following “House” and substituted “per diem or mileage reimbursement” for “reimbursement for expenses.”

As the constitutional amendment delineating the compensation of legislators contains no prohibition of additional compensation, this section and §§10-2-211 (repealed) and10-2-213 (repealed), giving them allowances during the interim period between legislative sessions, are constitutional. Jones v. Mears, 256 Ark. 825, 510 S.W.2d 857 (1974) (decided under Const. Amend. 37, now see Const. Amend. 56).

Publisher's Notes. These sections, concerning reimbursement for interim and regular and extraordinary sessions expenses, were repealed by identical Acts 1991, Nos. 969 and 1240, § 10. The sections were derived from the following sources:

10-2-213. Acts 1971, No. 274, § 3; 1975, No. 169, § 2; 1983, No. 52, § 1; 1983, No. 933, § 11; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 4-140, 4-140.1; Acts 1989 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 3, § 11.

10-2-214. Acts 1987, No. 1, § 5; 1987, No. 2, § 5; 1987, No. 935, § 13; 1989 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 143, § 5; 1989 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 204, § 5.

A member of the General Assembly shall not file with the House of Representatives or Senate claims for expense reimbursement in excess of the maximum amount prescribed by law.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Former §10-2-215, concerning additional compensation for committee chairmen and cochairmen, is deemed to be superseded by this section. The former section was derived from Acts 1985, No. 273, § 13; A.S.A. 1947, § 4-140.2.

As amended by Acts 1995, No. 1312, § 15, subsection (a) ended:

“Provided however, the House chairperson of the Review/PEER Subcommittee and the Personnel Subcommittee of the Joint Budget Committee shall commence receiving the additional allowance during the month when presession budget hearings begin prior to the 1997 Regular Session.”

Acts 2007, No. 288, § 4, provided: “This act shall apply retroactively to March 1, 2007.”

Pursuant to Acts 2009, No. 248, § 5, the amendment of §10-2-215 by Acts 2009, No. 248, § 1, is superseded by the amendment of §10-2-215 by Acts 2009, Nos. 2 and 84.

Amendments. The 2007 amendment, in (a), divided and the introductory paragraph as (1) and (2), in (2) inserted “the chairs of each subcommittee of Legislative Council,” “and the chairs of each subcommittee of Legislative Joint Auditing Committee,” “president Pro Tempore Designate,” and “and Senate,” and substituted “three thousand six hundred dollars ($3,600)” for “two thousand four hundred dollars ($2,400)”, in (2), substituted “one thousand eight hundred dollars ($1,800)” for “one thousand two hundred dollars ($1,200)” and added the second sentence, added (3), and made related changes.

The 2009 amendment by No. 2, in (a), inserted “the Speaker of the House of Representatives, the Speaker Pro Tempore of the House of Representatives” in (a)(1), inserted (a)(2), redesignated the remaining subdivisions accordingly, changed an internal section reference in (a)(3), and made related changes.

The 2009 amendment by No. 84 added (c).

The 2009 amendment by No. 248 rewrote (a) and redesignated its provisions as (a) through (c); in (b)(1), substituted “of the General Assembly is” for “shall be,” deleted “an additional” following “to receive,” and added “in addition to the expense allowance provided by §10-2-212”; in (b)(2), added “in addition to the expense allowance provided in §10-2-212” and made minor stylistic changes; in (d), inserted “provided by this section” following “allowance,” deleted “and all laws amendatory and supplemental thereto” from the end and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2011 amendment inserted “the President Pro Tempore of the Senate” and inserted “of the Senate” following “President Pro Tempore Designate” in (a)(1).

The 2015 amendment by identical acts Nos. 555 and 556 substituted “Expense reimbursement” for “Additional compensation” in the section heading; added “for reimbursement of legislative expenses incurred” throughout (a); deleted “In addition to the expense allowance provided by §10-2-212 and all laws amendatory and supplemental thereto” at the beginning of (a)(1); in (a)(2)(A), deleted “In addition to the expense allowance provided by §10-2-212” at the beginning, deleted “House” preceding “vice chair,” inserted “of either house of the General Assembly,” and substituted “vice chairs” for “House vice chair”; substituted “General Assembly” for “House” in (a)(2)(B); redesignated former (a)(3) as (a)(3)(A) and (B); deleted former (b) and redesignated (c) as (b); in present (b), inserted “of Representatives or the Senate” twice and substituted “reimbursement of legislative expenses incurred” for “an allowance”; and added (c) and (d).

Publisher's Notes. This section, concerning reimbursement for legislative services personnel, was repealed by identical Acts 2015, Nos. 555 and 556, § 4.The section was derived from Acts 1989 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 143, § 14; 1989 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 204, § 13; 1991, No. 30, § 13.

“Interim committees of the General Assembly” means and includes:

The Legislative Council, as established by § 10-3-301;

The Legislative Joint Auditing Committee, as established by § 10-3-401;

The respective interim committees of the General Assembly, established and authorized by § 10-3-203;

The Joint Interim Committee on Legislative Facilities, as established by § 10-3-1101;

The Joint Committee on Legislative Printing Requirements and Specifications, as established by § 10-3-602;

The Joint Committee on Public Retirement and Social Security Programs, as established by § 10-3-701;

The Joint Interim Committee on Energy, as established by § 10-3-820;

The Joint Performance Review Committee, as established by § 10-3-901; and

Any other interim committee of the General Assembly created by law; and

“Other interim legislative duties as authorized by law” includes:

Service by members of the General Assembly in connection with the legislative program of Boys State and Girls State, as authorized by § 10-2-121;

Attendance by members and members-elect of the General Assembly at the biennial Institute of Legislative Procedure held preceding the convening of each regular session of the General Assembly, as authorized by law; and

The performance of other interim legislative duties which are not specifically enumerated in this section, but for which per diem and mileage reimbursement is authorized by law.

Publisher's Notes. This section, concerning a transportation allowance for the President Pro Tempore of the Senate, was repealed by Acts 1993, No. 671, § 12. The section was derived from Acts 1989 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 3, § 13.

This section is merely declaratory of an essential power of each house. Ashton v. Ferguson, 164 Ark. 254, 261 S.W. 624 (1924).

It is the intent of this section to establish uniform per diem and mileage allowances for attendance by members of the General Assembly at meetings of interim committees of the General Assembly and for performing other interim legislative duties as members of the General Assembly where authorized by law.

The allowances provided in this section shall be in lieu of per diem and mileage allowances which otherwise may have been established by laws enacted prior to February 26, 1985.

Each house shall control its own contingent expenses. When any account properly chargeable to the House of Representatives shall be adjusted and allowed according to the Rules of the House of Representatives, a certificate thereof shall be granted, signed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives, and attested by the Chief Clerk of the House of Representatives. When any account or demand for contingent expenses of the Senate shall be allowed, according to the Rules of the Senate, a certificate thereof shall be granted, signed by the President of the Senate and attested by the Secretary of the Senate.

All joint and contingent expenses shall be controlled by the concurrent vote of both houses and shall be ascertained and adjusted according to their joint rules, and a certificate thereof shall be signed by the President of the Senate and countersigned by the Secretary of the Senate.

Every certificate issued in accordance with the provisions of this section shall specify the amount due, on what account, and the fund out of which it is to be paid. The Auditor of State, on the delivery of any such certificate to him or her, shall draw his or her warrant therefor accordingly as in the case of other demands against the state.

The Chief Clerk of the House of Representatives shall procure all printing, stationery, paper, and other necessary supplies for the use of the House of Representatives and shall have the power to distribute them among the members.

The Secretary of the Senate shall procure all printing, stationery, paper, and other necessary supplies for the use of the Senate and shall have the power to distribute them among the members thereof.

The Chief Clerk of the House of Representatives and the Secretary of the Senate shall let all contracts for the articles enumerated in this section. Contracts shall be let to the lowest and best responsible bidder.

The Chief Clerk of the House of Representatives and the Secretary of the Senate shall give notice by one (1) publication in a newspaper having a circulation in the State of Arkansas that contracts for the printing and supplies herein enumerated are to be let and that three (3) days from the date of publication of the newspaper all bids for the contracts of printing and for furnishing supplies will be opened to ascertain the best and lowest bid. No bid shall be opened sooner than three (3) days from the date of publication of the notice.

All bids must be in writing and under seal.

Cross References. Contracts given to lowest responsible bidder, Ark. Const. Amend. 54.

State publications, §25-18-201 et seq.

Publisher's Notes. Acts 2003, No. 744 became law without the Governor's signature.

Authorized to attend national or regional conferences under the same conditions as apply to the attendance at the conferences after sine die adjournment of the General Assembly; and

Entitled to receive reimbursement from the same sources and under the same conditions for conferences occurring after sine die adjournment for:

Reasonable and necessary expenses for:

Travel;

Meals; and

Lodging; and

Other authorized expenses.

(1)A member of the General Assembly may travel to a national or regional conference by commercial airplane, private vehicle, or other approved method of transportation.

Travel authorized by a chair of a legislative committee shall also be subject to approval by the Speaker of the House of Representatives or the President Pro Tempore of the Senate.

When the Speaker of the House of Representatives or the President Pro Tempore of the Senate provides the written authorization to travel, the Speaker of the House of Representatives or his or her designee or the President Pro Tempore of the Senate or his or her designee shall determine the amount of reimbursement in dollars and cents.

A member of the General Assembly who prefers to be reimbursed for travel to a national or regional conference by a mode of transportation other than private vehicle or commercial airplane shall submit a request for reimbursement to the Speaker of the House of Representatives or the President Pro Tempore of the Senate in a manner established respectively by the Speaker of the House of Representatives or the President Pro Tempore of the Senate.

A member of the General Assembly who submits a request for reimbursement under subdivision (b)(3)(A) of this section shall be reimbursed at a rate documented in writing and approved by the Speaker of the House of Representatives or the President Pro Tempore of the Senate.

Publisher's Notes. Acts 2003, No. 744 became law without the Governor's signature.

Amendments. The 2011 amendment by identical acts Nos. 48 and 71 added (b).

History.

Acts 1836, § 4, p. 46; C. & M. Dig., § 4958; Pope's Dig., § 6188; Acts 1959, No. 6, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 4-157.

10-2-202. Salary of deceased member.

The Auditor of State is authorized and directed to pay to the surviving spouse, or if there is no surviving spouse then to the surviving children, or if there is no surviving spouse or children then to the next of kin of any member of the General Assembly who shall die before the expiration of his or her elected term, the monthly salary of the deceased member due and payable from the time of death to:

The payment shall be made monthly and shall be payable from the funds appropriated for the payment of legislative salaries.

History.

Acts 1961, No. 112, § 1; 1963, No. 259, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 4-158.

10-2-203 — 10-2-210. [Reserved.]

10-2-212. Per diem and mileage reimbursement.

(1)The Senate Efficiency Committee shall determine, within the limitations of the Arkansas Constitution and Internal Revenue Service guidelines, the amount of per diem and mileage reimbursement to be paid from Senate appropriations.

Subdivision (a)(1) of this section does not apply to per diem, mileage, and expense reimbursements paid from funds disbursed by the Legislative Auditor or the Director of the Bureau of Legislative Research.

(1)(A)The Speaker of the House of Representatives shall determine, within the limitations of the Arkansas Constitution and Internal Revenue Service guidelines, the amount of per diem and mileage reimbursement to be paid from House of Representatives appropriations.

History.

Acts 1971, No. 274, § 2; 1975, No. 169, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 4-139; Acts 1991, No. 969, § 1; 1991, No. 1240, § 1; 1995, No. 1312, §§ 12, 22; 1997, No. 1285, §§ 14, 19; 2007, No. 288, § 1, 2; 2015, No. 555, § 2; 2015, No. 556, § 2.